Wyoming, session 2025, SF0018.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-14-204(a)(iii) and (iv) and
39-14-205 by creating a new subsection (q) are amended to
read:

39-14-204. Tax rate.

SF0018

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0043
(a) Except as otherwise provided by this section and
W.S. 39-14-205, the total severance tax on crude oil, lease
condensate or natural gas shall be six percent (6%),
comprising one and one-half percent (1.5%) imposed by the
Wyoming constitution article 15, section 19 and the
remaining amount imposed by Wyoming statute. The tax shall
be distributed as provided in W.S. 39-14-211 and is imposed
as follows:

(iii) Two percent (2%), except as provided in
W.S. 39-14-205(q); plus

(iv) Two percent (2%), except as provided in
W.S. 39-14-205(n) and (q).

39-14-205. Exemptions.

(q) Crude oil and natural gas production resulting
from oil and gas that is produced by means of enhanced oil
and gas recovery is exempt from one-half (1/2) of the
severance taxes imposed under W.S. 39-14-204(a)(iii) and
from all of the severance taxes imposed under W.S.
39-14-204(a)(iv), subject to the following:
SF0018

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0043

(i) As used in this subsection:

(A) "Carbon capture, utilization and
storage technology" means technology that has the principal
purpose of capturing, reusing, storing, sequestering or
using carbon dioxide emissions to prevent carbon dioxide
from entering the atmosphere;

(B) "Enhanced oil and gas recovery" means
all existing and future technologies or methods to recover
oil and gas beyond traditional primary and secondary
recovery methods, including technology to optimize
development and recovery of oil and gas resources in new
fields.

(ii) The taxpayer seeking the exemption shall
complete an application for the exemption on a form and in
the manner prescribed by the department;

(iii) To qualify for the exemption under this
subsection, the crude oil and natural gas shall be produced
SF0018

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0043
by means of enhanced oil and gas recovery from projects
using carbon capture, utilization and storage technology;

(iv) The carbon dioxide captured and used in the
enhanced oil and gas recovery to produce crude oil and
natural gas shall be from a carbon dioxide source
originating within the state of Wyoming;

(v) To ensure that the crude oil and natural gas
production by means of enhanced oil and gas recovery
satisfies the conditions of this subsection, the department
may consult with the public service commission and the
Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission before
approving the exemption under this subsection;

(vi) The department may promulgate rules as
necessary to implement this subsection;

(vii) Not later than November 1 of each year,
the department shall report to the joint revenue interim
committee and the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim committee on the use of the exemption
under this subsection and the associated revenue impacts.
SF0018

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0043

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0018